North Carolina, session 2025, SB15.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 145 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 145-52. State marine mammal.
The bottlenose dolphin is adopted as the official marine mammal of the State of North
Carolina."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S15-v-1*